Utah statutes.
39-1-12.5.   Convening authority for military court.
(1)  The governor or the adjutant general of the state is the convening
authority for any military court in the state, and upon receipt of charges, as
outlined in the Utah Manual for Military Courts, may:
(a)  dismiss any charges;
(b)  forward charges to a subordinate commander for disposition; or
(c)  refer charges to a military court for trial.
(2)  The military court shall be convened under the Utah Manual for Military
Courts.
